Utah statutes.
57-1-4.   Attempted conveyance of more than grantor owns -- Effect.
A conveyance made by an owner of an estate for life or years, purporting to
convey a greater estate than he could lawfully transfer, does not work a
forfeiture of his estate, but passes to the grantee all the estate which the
grantor could lawfully transfer.
